Utah statutes.
7-22-101.   Definitions -- Exemptions.

(1)  As used in this chapter:

(a)  "Escrow" means an agreement, express or implied, that provides for one or more parties to deliver or entrust money, a certificate of deposit, a security, a negotiable instrument, a deed, or other property or asset to another person to be held, paid, or delivered in accordance with terms and conditions prescribed in the agreement.

(b)  "Escrow agent" means a person that provides or offers to provide escrow services to the public.

(2)  This chapter does not apply to:

(a)  a trust company authorized to engage in the trust business in Utah in accordance with Chapter 5, Trust Business;

(b)  a person other than an escrow agent regulated under this chapter that is exempted from the definition of trust business in Subsection 7-5-1(1);

(c)  a depository institution chartered by a state or the federal government that is engaged in business as a depository institution in Utah;

(d)  the State Board of Regents, the Utah Higher Education Assistance Authority, or the State Treasurer; and

(e)  a person licensed under Title 31A, Insurance Code.



Amended by Chapter 73, 2013 General Session

